District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.25

Payment to minor.

If a financial institution is required or permitted to make payment pursuant to this subchapter to a minor designated as a beneficiary, payment may be made pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Code.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 225 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).